Rhode Island statutes. Title 14 Delinquent and Dependent Children
Chapter 1 Proceedings in Family Court
14-1-11.1.
Commitment of voluntary placements.

The department of children, youth and families shall petition the family court and request the care, custody, and control of any child who is voluntarily placed with the department for the purpose of foster care by a parent or other person previously having custody and who remains in foster care for a period of twelve (12) months. However, there shall be no requirement for the department to seek custody of any child with an emotional, behavioral or mental disorder or developmental or physical disability if the child is voluntarily placed with the department by a parent or guardian of the child for the purpose of accessing an out-of-home program for the child in a program which provides services for children with disabilities, including, but not limited to, residential treatment programs, residential counseling centers, and therapeutic foster care programs.

In a hearing on a petition alleging that a child is dependent, competent and creditable evidence that the child has remained in foster care for a period of twelve (12) months shall constitute prima facie evidence sufficient to support the finding by the court that the child is “dependent” in accordance with §

14-1-3

.

In those cases where a young adult who meets the eligibility criteria in §

14-1-6(c)

wishes to continue in foster care after age eighteen (18), the young adult and an authorized representative of DCYF shall, before the youth reaches age eighteen (18), discuss the terms of a voluntary placement agreement for extension of care to be executed upon or after the young adult’s eighteenth birthday.

In those cases where a young adult who meets the eligibility criteria in §

14-1-6(c)

exits foster care at or after age eighteen (18), but wishes to return to foster care before age twenty-one (21), DCYF shall file a petition for legal supervision of the young adult, with a voluntary placement agreement for extension of care, executed by the young adult and an authorized representative of DCYF attached.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 15, § 1.

14-1-12.
Form and contents of petition.

The petition shall plainly state the facts which bring the child within the provisions of this chapter, and shall set forth the name, age, and residence of:

The child;

The child’s parents;

The child’s other legal guardian, if there is one;

The person or persons having custody or control of the child; and

The nearest known relative, if no parent or guardian can be found.

If any of the facts required by subsection (a) of this section are not known by the petitioner, the petition shall so state.

The proceeding shall be entitled “In the matter of a child under eighteen (18) years of age”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-12

.

14-1-13.
Complaints pertaining to feeble-minded persons.

Any complaint brought before the family court under the provisions of title 40.1 shall be brought by the person and in the manner set forth by title 40.1.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-13

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14.

14-1-14.
Petitions for adoption.

Any petition for the adoption of any person under the age of eighteen (18) years shall be brought before the family court in the manner set forth in chapter 7 of title 15.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-14

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14.

14-1-15.
Warrants for offenses against children.

The family court is vested with authority to issue a warrant for any offense by any person as set forth in §§

11-9-1

—

11-9-8

and chapter 9 of title 15.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-15

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14.

14-1-16.
Summons of child or adult in charge of child.

Upon the filing of a petition, the justice, if satisfied that there is reasonable cause for the petition, may issue a summons requiring the child to appear before the court at a time and place named in it, and shall also cause a summons to be issued to at least one of the parents of the child if either of them is known to reside within the state, or if there is no parent, then to the guardian or other lawful custodian of the child, if there is one known to be so resident, and, if not, then to the person with whom the child resides, if known.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-16

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14; P.L. 1982, ch. 198, § 1.

14-1-17.
Service of summons.

The summons shall require the person upon whom it is served to appear before the court at a time and place stated in it for a hearing on the petition, the allegations of which shall be set forth in the summons, and the summons shall be served by reading it to, and leaving a copy with, the person to be served, or by leaving an attested copy at the last and usual place of abode of the person summoned, with some person living there. However, in the event that the justice has reason to believe that the child may not appear upon summons, or in the event that a child has been summoned and does not appear, the justice may issue a warrant reciting the substance of the petition and requiring the officer to whom it is directed to immediately take the child and bring it before the court to be dealt with according to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-17

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14; P.L. 1985, ch. 98, § 1.

14-1-18.
Process running throughout state — Persons authorized to serve.

All summonses, warrants, orders, and other processes issued by the court shall run throughout the state and may be served by any officer authorized to serve the warrants of district courts or by any probation counselor, or by any officer of any private agency, society, or institution prescribed in this chapter, or by any person that may be designated by the justice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-18

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14.

14-1-19.
Failure to obey summons.

Any parent, guardian, lawful custodian, or other person having the care and control of a child, who shall willfully refuse or neglect to appear in court in accordance with any summons served upon him or her may be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) or be imprisoned not more than three (3) months.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-19

; P.L. 1982, ch. 55, § 1.

Participation by Other Means.

If a parent wishes to be present at a termination hearing but a personal appearance is not possible, the court should ascertain whether alternative means of participation can be afforded the parent and should then direct an attorney representing an out of state incarcerated parent to inform the client of the possibility of participating by deposition, telephone, or with the help of transcripts and communication with counsel. In re Brandon A., 769 A.2d 586,

2001 R.I. LEXIS 98

(R.I. 2001).

14-1-20.
Release or placement of child in custody of officer.

Whenever any officer takes a child into custody, he or she shall, unless it is impracticable or has been otherwise ordered by the court, accept the written promise of the parent, guardian, or other custodian of the child to bring the child to the court at the time fixed. Upon that promise the child may be released in the custody of a parent, guardian, or other custodian. If not so released, the child shall be placed in the custody of a probation counselor or other person designated by the court, or shall immediately be taken to the court or other place of detention designated by the court, and the officer taking him or her shall immediately notify the court and shall file a petition when directed to do so by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-20

.

14-1-21.
Release or detention of child under custody of court.

In the case of any child whose custody has been assumed by the court, the child may, pending the final disposition of the case, be released in the custody of a parent, guardian, or other custodian, or of a probation counselor or other person appointed by the court, to be brought before the court at the designated time. When not released as provided in this section, the child, pending the hearing of the case, shall be detained at the training school subject to §§

14-1-11

and

14-1-27

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-21

; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 17, § 9.

14-1-22.
Taking child into immediate custody.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as forbidding any police officer or probation counselor from immediately taking into custody any child who is found violating any law or ordinance, or whose surroundings are such as to endanger his health, morals, or welfare, unless immediate action is taken. In each of these cases, the officer taking the child into custody shall immediately report the fact to the court and the case shall then be proceeded with as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-22

.

14-1-23.
Place of detention of juveniles.

The board of police commissioners or other corresponding police authority of each city and town, and the city council of each city and town council of each town where no board of police commissioners or other corresponding police authority, exists, may provide and maintain, in their respective city or town, a suitable place or places not directly connected with any jail or lockup in which children temporarily detained awaiting the action of the court may be kept so long as detention may be necessary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-23

.

14-1-24.
Care of girls detained.

Whenever a girl is detained, she may be placed in the care of a police matron, and in the case of a city or town, the police matron may be one of those required to be appointed under the provisions of chapter 5 of title 13; and the board of police commissioners of any city or town where that board exists may appoint a police matron for that purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-24

.

14-1-25.
Arrest of juveniles without warrant.

Any officer authorized to make an arrest for any criminal offense may take into custody without a warrant any child believed to be delinquent or wayward within that officer’s jurisdiction, but in no case shall a child be detained in custody longer than twenty-four (24) hours without being referred to the family court for consideration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-25

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14.

14-1-26.
Separation from adult offenders.

In case a delinquent or wayward child is taken into custody or detained before or after the filing of a petition, or pending a hearing on the petition, the child shall not be confined in any prison, jail, lockup, or reformatory, or be transported with, or compelled or permitted to associate or mingle with, criminal, vicious, or dissolute persons, but shall be kept under the care of the person arresting the child, or of a police matron as provided in §

14-1-24

, until by order of the court other disposition is made of the child as provided in this chapter; and if the child is ordered to be detained or confined in any of the institutions mentioned in this chapter, the child shall not be conveyed to or from the institution with adult offenders.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-26

.

14-1-26.1.
Temporary custody of status and non-offenders.

A juvenile taken into custody at a state, municipal, or college police department for an offense that would not be classified as criminal if committed by an adult, or non-offender juveniles, such as dependent or neglected children, shall be held for identification, investigation, and processing purposes only in an unlocked, multi-purpose room that is not designated for residential use or secure detention. The child shall not be handcuffed to a stationary object and must remain in continuous visual supervision of an agency representative.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 259, § 1.

14-1-27.
Temporary detention in public or private institutions.

Subject to §

14-1-11

, provision may be made by the family court for the temporary detention of children at the training school for youth or in the custody of the director of the department of children, youth and families. The court may authorize the temporary placement of children in private homes licensed and approved by the department of children, youth and families and subject to the supervision of the court, or may arrange with any incorporated institution or agency licensed for child care, to receive for temporary care children ordered detained by the court. Unless good cause is shown to delay the commencement of the adjudicatory hearing, if a child is in detention, the family court shall commence the adjudicatory hearing within thirty (30) calendar days from whichever of the following events occurs latest: the date the petition is served on the child; or the date the child is placed in detention. In all such cases, the family court shall conclude the adjudicatory hearing within fifteen (15) calendar days of the commencement of the hearing unless good cause is shown to extend an adjudicatory hearing beyond fifteen (15) calendar days.

In any case wherein the attorney general files an application to waive and/or certify a youth, the juvenile may be detained at the training school for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days. In such cases, the department shall present to the family court a waiver report within forty-five (45) calendar days. At the expiration of ninety (90) days, the attorney general’s petition for waiver and/or certification shall be decided by the family court, unless good cause is shown to extend the time upon which the family court may render such a decision.

When DCYF makes application to the court to take a child into temporary custody due to allegations of abuse and/or neglect or dependency, DCYF shall have the duty to investigate the possibility of placing the child or children with a fit and willing relative not residing with the parents. DCYF shall conduct an assessment into the appropriateness of placement of the child or children with the relative within thirty (30) days of the child’s placement in the temporary custody of DCYF. If the department determines that the relative is a fit and proper person to have placement of the child, the child shall be placed with that relative, unless the particular needs of the child make the placement contrary to the child’s best interests. All placements with relatives shall be subject to criminal records checks in accordance with §

14-1-34

, foster care regulations promulgated by DCYF, and interstate compact approval, if necessary.

If DCYF proposes to place the child with a relative outside the state of Rhode Island, DCYF shall notify the parent who shall have an opportunity to file an objection to the placement with the family court within ten (10) days of receipt of the notice. A hearing shall be held before the child is placed outside the state of Rhode Island.

If the request of a relative for placement of a child or children is denied by DCYF, that relative shall have the right to petition the court for review. The court shall within five (5) days of the request conduct a hearing as to the suitability of temporary placement with the relative and shall make any orders incident to placement that it deems meet and just.

Whenever the court determines that permanent placement or adoption is in the best interest of a child, a fit and willing relative who has been awarded placement of the child shall be given priority over a non-relative, provided that the placement or adoption is in the best interest of the child.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-27

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1986, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 23, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 17, § 9.

14-1-28.
Transfer of cases from other courts.

If, during the pendency of a criminal or quasi-criminal charge against any person in any other court it shall be ascertained that the person was under the age of eighteen (18) years at the time of committing the alleged offense, it shall be the duty of the court to immediately transfer the case, together with all the papers, documents, and records of testimony connected with the case, to the family court. The court making the transfer shall order the child to be taken immediately to the family court or to the place of detention designated by the family court, or release the child in the custody of some suitable person, to appear before the family court at a time designated by the family court. The family court shall upon the transfer proceed to hear and dispose of the case in the same manner as if it had been instituted in that court in the first instance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-28

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14.

14-1-29.
Times and places of hearings.

The court shall designate suitable times and places for the hearing of all matters arising within its jurisdiction and may sit at any other times and places within the state that the court may seem best adapted to the carrying out of the purposes of this chapter. Hearings under this chapter may be adjourned from time to time and to different places within the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-29

.

14-1-30.
Conduct of hearings.

In the hearing of any case, the general public shall be excluded; only an attorney or attorneys, selected by the parents or guardian of a child to represent the child, may attend, and only those other persons shall be admitted who have a direct interest in the case, and as the justice may direct. All cases involving children shall be heard separately and apart from the trial of cases against adults.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-30

; P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 6.

14-1-30.1.
Compelling evidence in hearings — Immunity.

In the hearing of any case in which a child is alleged to be delinquent or wayward, if a person refuses to answer a question or produce other evidence of any kind on the ground that he or she may be incriminated by it, or if a child refuses to answer a question or produce other evidence of any kind on the ground that it supports a finding that he or she is delinquent or wayward, and if the attorney general, in writing, requests the chief judge of the family court or his or her designee to order that person or child to answer the question or produce the evidence, the court, in its discretion, after notice to the witness, may order the person or child to answer the question or produce the evidence. In deciding those matters, the chief judge or his or her designee shall consider whether the person may be incriminated, or whether the evidence may support a finding that the child is delinquent or wayward, in some other jurisdiction. After complying, and if, but for this section, he or she would have been privileged to withhold the answer given or the evidence produced by him or her, that person or child shall not be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which, in accordance with the order, he gave answer or produced evidence. But he or she may, nevertheless, be prosecuted or subjected to penalty or forfeiture for any perjury, false swearing, or contempt committed in answering or failing to answer, or in producing, or failing to produce, evidence in accordance with the order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 217, § 2.

14-1-30.2.
Foster parents — Notice of court proceedings.

The department of children, youth and families shall provide notice to foster parents, pre-adoptive parents or relatives providing care for a child of any review or hearing to be held with respect to a child in the care of the department. The foster parents, pre-adoptive parents or relatives providing care for a child may attend the hearing and file with the court a report, either written or oral, for the purpose of conveying to the court information relating to the best interest of the child. Nothing in this section shall be construed to give the foster parents, pre-adoptive parents or relatives providing care for a child legal standing as a party to the petition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 87, § 1.

14-1-31.
Services of public defender.

Prior to the commencement of any hearing, the justice shall advise the parent or guardian of any child, or the adult involved, as the case may be, that if he or she is financially unable to engage counsel, he or she is entitled to the services of the public defender. The public defender shall, at the request of a justice of the family court, appear in court on behalf of that person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-31

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14.

14-1-32.
Power of court to order disposition of child.

If the court finds that a child is delinquent, wayward, neglected, dependent, or otherwise within the provisions of this chapter, it may by order duly entered proceed as follows:

The court may place the child on probation or under supervision in his or her own home or in the custody of a relative or other suitable person, or in the custody of the director of children, youth and families, upon any terms the court determines. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the placement of a child in any facility licensed or approved by another department of state government, upon any terms that the court shall determine; provided, that if the court finds that a child is delinquent or wayward for any offense which has resulted in damage to the property of another, then the court may order that appropriate monetary restitution be made immediately to the owner of the damaged property by the child, his or her parent, parents, or guardian or other lawful custodian, upon examination and after a finding that the child, or his or her parent, parents, or guardian or other lawful custodian, has the ability to pay restitution.

The court may order the child to engage in community restitution at a state or municipal agency or department in addition to or in lieu of restitution, for a period of time to be determined by the court.

The court may order the parent or parents of the child to undertake a program of counseling, which program shall be designed to attempt to remedy those conditions which led to the child’s coming before the court.

The court may, by order duly entered, prior to a finding that a child is delinquent, wayward, neglected, dependent, or otherwise within the provisions of this chapter, place the petition on file. The court may, in its discretion, attach conditions to the petition. The conditions shall be a valid court order. If no action is taken on the petition for a period of one year or less, if so ordered, following the filing, the authorization issuing the petition shall be revoked by the clerk and the petition shall be closed.

The court may, after a hearing on either a stenographic or tape recorded record, and after also considering any need of the juvenile and/or the juvenile’s family for the juvenile to have a driver’s license, the relative benefits of the juvenile retaining or losing driving privileges, and whether any circumstances in the school environment or educational services are adversely affecting the juvenile’s school attendance deny, revoke, suspend and/or reinstate a juvenile’s driving privileges including both the learning license and/or driver’s license of any juvenile deemed wayward as a result of the family court finding the child truant pursuant to chapter 19 of title 16 and/or wayward/delinquent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-32

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1976, ch. 292, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 23, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 167, § 1.

14-1-32.1.
Juvenile victim restitution program.

If a judge of the family court finds that a child is delinquent, wayward, or otherwise within the provisions of this chapter, and places the child on probation, he or she shall, where appropriate, require the child to compensate the victim for losses due to the act of the child, and the child shall make restitution in a reasonable amount within a reasonable period of time and in accordance with that payment schedule established by the judge from funds earned by the child pursuant to employment engaged in by the child. The restitution shall be made under the direction of a probation counselor in cooperation with the administrator of the juvenile victim restitution program within the family court.

If the child is not employed, the probation counselor, in cooperation with the restitution program administrator or a member of his or her staff, shall make a reasonable effort to find private or other public employment for the child. However, if the child does not have employment after a reasonable time and private or other public employment is not obtained, despite the efforts of the restitution program staff, the child shall, where appropriate, be directed by the court to perform work in some type of community restitution and with arrangements for compensation pursuant to §

14-1-32.2

. If parents make monetary restitution, the child may still be ordered to perform community restitution without compensation.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the employer of a juvenile hired pursuant to the provisions of this section shall receive a credit of ten percent (10%) of the amount of wages paid to the juvenile annually against the state income tax owed by the employer, provided the credit shall not exceed the sum of three thousand dollars ($3,000) annually.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. XXIV, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 185, § 1.

14-1-32.2.
Administration of program — Payment for services.

The family court shall be responsible for the administration of the restitution program, shall oversee and coordinate all local community based juvenile restitution programs, and shall process and make all payments to children who are required to perform community restitution in lieu of other public or private employment pursuant to §

14-1-32.1

. The probation counselor responsible for a child offender, or a child restitution office in the local city or town, shall maintain time sheets and other documents necessary to determine and process the payment of child offenders. Remuneration for the services provided by the child offender in a community restitution job shall be made as a wage payment by check, with the child offender listed as the payee. However, the check shall be mailed to the child’s probation counselor or a child restitution office established by the cities and towns. The child offender shall pay the victim of his or her acts seventy-five percent (75%) of each payment and twenty-five percent (25%) of the payment shall be retained by the child. This same percentage shall apply to the child offender who is otherwise employed at the time he or she is required to make restitution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. XXIV, § 1.

14-1-32.3.
Appropriations.

The general assembly shall appropriate one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for support and maintenance of the pilot juvenile restitution program; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of that appropriation or so much of it as may be necessary for the purposes appropriated, upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 244, § 1.

14-1-32.4.
Family counseling for drug or alcohol related offenses.

If the court finds that a child is delinquent or wayward for any violation of the Rhode Island Controlled Substances Act, chapter 28 of title 21, the court may order the child, his or her parent(s), guardian(s), and/or other lawful custodian(s) to participate in a program of counseling designed to attempt to remedy the conditions which led to the child’s coming before the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 284, § 5.

14-1-33.
Supervision of child placed on probation.

Whenever the court places a child on probation, the court may do so upon any terms and conditions, not inconsistent with law, that the court may deem best for the welfare of the child, but unless otherwise ordered by the court, a probation counselor may make any arrangements for the care of the child that he or she may deem best for its welfare, and may release the child in the care of its parent, guardian, or other lawful custodian, or in the care of any relative of the child. If a child has been placed on probation as provided in this chapter, the probation counselor may at any time before the discharge of the child take the child before the court without a warrant, or the court may issue a warrant to bring the child before the family court. When the child is before the court, the court may make any disposition of the case which it might have made before the child was placed on probation, or may continue or extend the period of probation.

At the end of the probation period of a child, the probation counselor shall make a report to the court, in writing, as to the conduct of the child during that period.

If, at any time during a child’s probationary term, the child is charged with an additional and subsequent delinquency offense, which if committed by an adult would be considered a felony, the probation counselor shall file a petition in the family court alleging that the child has violated probation.

If, at any time during a child’s probationary term the child is charged with an additional and subsequent wayward/disobedient or status offense, the probation counselor may file a petition in the family court alleging that the child has violated probation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-33

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14; P.L. 2013, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 415, § 1.

14-1-34.
Placement of dependent and neglected children — Criminal records of foster parents made available.

If, after a hearing on any petition, a child shall be found to be dependent or neglected within the meaning of this chapter, the court shall by decree assign the custody of the child to the director of children, youth and families, for any period that shall seem fit to the court; and the director of children, youth and families shall become entitled to the custody of the child to the exclusion of any other person. The court may at any time, for good cause shown, modify or revoke the decree.

The department of children, youth and families shall apply to the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department for a nationwide criminal records check of prospective foster parents or the department of children, youth and families may directly process a nationwide criminal records check of prospective foster parents and any household member age 18 and older. The check will conform to the applicable federal standards including the taking of fingerprints to identify the applicant. The department of children, youth and families shall request the attorney general, through the division of criminal identification, to make available any criminal record of present and prospective foster parents. The attorney general shall immediately comply with that request, and the department of children, youth and families shall examine these records in determining the suitability of these persons to be foster parents. The criminal record check shall be conducted without charge to the foster parents. At the conclusion of the background check required in this section, the state police, attorney general, or the local police department shall promptly destroy the fingerprint record of the applicant obtained pursuant to this chapter.

No license shall be issued by the department of children, youth and families to any individual seeking to be licensed as a foster parent until such time as the results of both the nationwide and statewide, criminal record background check, including the nature of any prior criminal record, are forwarded to the department of children, youth and families. The department may authorize the placement of a child in a prospective foster home pending licensure for a period not to exceed six (6) months only after the department has conducted a DCYF background check pursuant to §

40-13.2-3.1

and a statewide criminal record background check. In the event the department is unable to complete the licensing process within six (6) months of the child’s placement in the foster home, and if the department determines that continued placement of the child in said foster home is in the child’s best interest, the department shall file a petition with the family court to seek authorization to allow the child(ren) to remain in the foster home pending completion of the licensing process. The department shall provide notice of all such petitions to the office of the child advocate, children(s) parent/guardian, and CASA attorney.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-34

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1978, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 43, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 107, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 23, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 23, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 25, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 154, § 1.

14-1-35.
Guardianship of agency to which child entrusted — Adoption proceedings.

In the event that the court shall award a dependent or neglected child to the custody of the department of children, youth, and families, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the child shall, unless otherwise ordered, become a ward and be subject to the guardianship of the department. That guardianship shall not include the guardianship of any estate of the child. The department shall be made party to any proceeding for the legal adoption of the child and may, by its attorney or agent, appear in the family court where those proceedings are pending and consent to the adoption. However, when adoption proceedings shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the family court, then notice of the filing of the petition in the adoption proceedings shall be filed with the clerk of the family court at least twenty (20) days before any final decree of adoption shall be entered, and the entry of any final decree of adoption shall release the department from any liability which may have been incurred by it by reason of the commitment of the child to it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-35

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 23, § 2.

14-1-35.1.
Child advocate as guardian of estate of child in certain circumstances — Plan for disbursement of funds.

Subject to the provisions of §

14-1-35

, the office of the child advocate shall be the guardian of the estate of any child for whose benefit a judgment for compensation or order approving a settlement for compensation is entered by the court pursuant to the provisions of § 12-25-3, to be held by that office in accordance with the requirements of §

42-73-9.1

.

Upon the termination of proceedings instituted under this chapter, the child advocate shall formulate a plan for the disbursement of compensation for the sole benefit of the child, whether before or at the age of majority, which plan shall be presented to and approved by the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 317, § 4.

14-1-36.
Commitment of delinquent and wayward children.

In all proceedings under this chapter, the court may order a delinquent or wayward child to be committed to the training school for youth for a sentence no longer than the youth’s nineteenth birthday. However, nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit the placing of any child in the custody of the department of children, youth and families or any other agency, society, or institution, pursuant to §

14-1-32

. The commitment of delinquent or wayward children shall be by an order and all assignments of the custody of dependent, neglected, delinquent, or wayward children to the state training school for youth or to the custody of the department of children, youth and families or to any of the private institutions, agencies, or societies mentioned in this chapter shall be by a decree signed by the justice of the court by whom the order or decree is issued, and that order or decree shall be directed to any person that the court may designate, and shall require that person to take the child and deliver him or her to the officer in charge of the training school for youth or to the custody of the director of children, youth and families or of the public or private institution, agency, or society, and the order or decree shall constitute the person charged with it, while he or she has the order in his or her possession for service, an officer for all purposes under this chapter, in any county of the state in which it may be necessary for him or her to go. The person charged with carrying out the order or decree shall also deliver to the officer of the public or private institution, agency, or society or to the training school for youth or the director of children, youth and families a copy of the order or the decree signed by the justice of the court issuing it, and subject to the provisions of this chapter, the officer and other authorities in charge of the training school for youth or the director of children, youth and families or any public or private institution, agency, or society shall hold the child according to the terms of any other order or decree that may from time to time thereafter be issued by the court in relation to the child.

Whenever the court shall commit a child to the training school for youth or to the director of children, youth and families or any other institution or agency, it shall transmit with the order of commitment a summary of its information concerning the child.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 25; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1774, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-36

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 23, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 22, § 1.